Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-313
State Board
of Education; members; qualifications.

No person
shall be eligible to membership on the State Board of Education (1) who is
actively engaged in the teaching profession, (2) who is a holder of any state
office or a member of a state board
or commission unless the board or commission is limited to an advisory capacity, or (3) unless he or she is a citizen of the United States,
a resident of the state for a period of at least six months, and a resident
of the district from which he or she is elected for a period of at least six
months immediately preceding his or her election.

Laws 1953, c. 320, § 3, p. 1054;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 590;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-323;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 141;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 16.